Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska22-210
County seat; site; lots; sale.

The remainder of the lots shall be offered at public sale by the sheriff of the county to the highest bidder at such time as the county board may designate. Notice of such sale shall be posted up in three public places of the county. The terms of sale shall be determined by the county board and they may dispose of lots at private sale upon such terms as they may deem best.

G.S.1873, c. 12, § 87, p. 230;

R.S.1913, § 921;

C.S.1922, § 827;

C.S.1929, § 25-210;

R.S.1943, § 22-210;

Laws 1996, LB 299, § 15.